District of Columbia statutes.
34-2156

Non-liability of the District and the Water and Sewer Authority.

The replacement of a lead service line that is located on private property and that is funded, in whole or in part, pursuant to this chapter shall not be the responsibility of the District or WASA. Neither the District nor WASA shall be liable for any negligent acts or acts of omission associated with the replacement of lead service lines, and the District shall incur no liability associated with the replacement of the lines.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6017, 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6017 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6017 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).